Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE J. PHARMACY AND PHARMACISTS

CHAPTER 552. TEXAS STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY

Sec. 552.001. MEMBERSHIP. (a) The Texas State Board of Pharmacy consists of 11 members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate as follows:

(1) seven members who are pharmacists;

(2) one member who is a pharmacy technician; and

(3) three members who represent the public.

(b) Appointments to the board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 26 (S.B. 500), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 552.002. QUALIFICATIONS. (a) The board must include representation for pharmacists who are primarily employed in Class A pharmacies and Class C pharmacies.

(b) A pharmacist board member must, at the time of appointment:

(1) be a resident of this state;

(2) have been licensed for the five years preceding appointment;

(3) be in good standing to practice pharmacy in this state; and

(4) be practicing pharmacy in this state.

(b-1) A pharmacy technician board member must, at the time of appointment:

(1) be a resident of this state;

(2) have been registered as a pharmacy technician for the five years preceding appointment;

(3) be in good standing to act as a pharmacy technician in this state; and

(4) be acting as a pharmacy technician in this state.

(c) Each person appointed to the board shall, not later than the 15th day after the date of appointment, qualify by taking the constitutional oath of office.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 26 (S.B. 500), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 552.003. PUBLIC MEMBERSHIP ELIGIBILITY. A person is not eligible for appointment as a public member of the board if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is registered, certified, or licensed by an occupational regulatory agency in the field of health care;

(2) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving funds from the board;

(3) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving funds from the board; or

(4) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or funds from the board, other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for board membership, attendance, or expenses.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 552.004. MEMBERSHIP RESTRICTIONS. (a) A person may not be a member of the board if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the board.

(b) A person may not be a member of the board if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 552.005. TERMS; VACANCY. (a) Members of the board are appointed for staggered six-year terms, with either three or four members' terms, as applicable, expiring every other year at midnight on the last day of the state fiscal year in the last year of the member's term.

(b) If a vacancy occurs during a member's term, the governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the unexpired term.

(c) A board member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms. The completion of the unexpired portion of a full term is not service for a full term for purposes of this subsection.

(d) A person appointed by the governor to a full term before the expiration of the term of the member being succeeded becomes a member of the board on the first day of the next state fiscal year following the appointment.

(e) A person appointed to an unexpired portion of a full term becomes a member of the board on the day after the date of appointment.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 26 (S.B. 500), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 552.006. BOARD MEMBER TRAINING. (a) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the board may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the board until the person completes a training program that complies with this section.

(b) The training program must provide the person with information regarding:

(1) the law governing the board's operations;

(2) the programs, functions, rules, and budget of the board;

(3) the scope of and limitations on the rulemaking authority of the board;

(4) the types of board rules, interpretations, and enforcement actions that may implicate federal antitrust law by limiting competition or impacting prices charged by persons engaged in a profession or business the board regulates, including rules, interpretations, and enforcement actions that:

(A) regulate the scope of practice of persons in a profession or business the board regulates;

(B) restrict advertising by persons in a profession or business the board regulates;

(C) affect the price of goods or services provided by persons in a profession or business the board regulates; and

(D) restrict participation in a profession or business the board regulates;

(5) the results of the most recent formal audit of the board;

(6) the requirements of:

(A) laws relating to open meetings, public information, administrative procedure, and disclosing conflicts of interest; and

(B) other laws applicable to members of the board in performing their duties; and

(7) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the board or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the board is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

(d) The executive director shall create a training manual that includes the information required by Subsection (b). The executive director shall distribute a copy of the training manual annually to each board member. On receipt of the training manual, each board member shall sign and submit to the executive director a statement acknowledging receipt of the training manual. The board shall publish a copy of each signed statement on the board's Internet website.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2561), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 552.007. OFFICERS. (a) The governor shall designate a member of the board as the president of the board to serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the governor. The board shall elect from its members for one-year terms a vice president, treasurer, and other officers the board considers appropriate and necessary to conduct board business.

(b) The board's president shall preside at each board meeting and is responsible for the performance of the board's duties and functions under this subtitle.

(c) An officer, other than the president, shall perform the duties normally associated with the officer's position and other duties assigned to the officer by the board.

(d) The term of an officer begins on the first day of the state fiscal year following the officer's election and ends on election of a successor.

(e) A member elected as an officer may not serve more than two consecutive full terms in each office to which the member is elected.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 552.008. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL. (a) It is a ground for removal from the board that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of appointment the qualifications required for appointment to the board;

(2) does not maintain during service on the board the qualifications required for appointment to the board;

(3) violates a prohibition established by Section 552.004;

(4) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(5) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled board meetings the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year, unless the absence is excused by majority vote of the board.

(b) If the executive director has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the executive director shall notify the president of the board of the ground. The president shall then notify the governor that a potential ground for removal exists.

(c) The validity of an action of the board is not affected by the fact that the action is taken when a ground for removal of a board member exists.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 552.009. PER DIEM; REIMBURSEMENT. (a) Each member of the board is entitled to a per diem set by legislative appropriation for each day the member engages in board business.

(b) A member is entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses as prescribed by the General Appropriations Act.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1345 (S.B. 410), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 552.010. MEETINGS.

(a) The board shall meet at least once every four months to transact board business.

(b) The board may meet at other times at the call of the board's president or two-thirds of the board's members.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 26 (S.B. 500), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 552.011. EXECUTIVE SESSION. (a) The board may, in accordance with Chapter 551, Government Code, conduct a portion of a board meeting in executive session.

(b) The board may conduct in executive session a deliberation relating to discipline of a license holder. At the conclusion of the deliberation, in open session the board shall vote and announce the board's decision relating to the license holder.

(c) The board may conduct in executive session a disciplinary hearing relating to a pharmacist or pharmacy student who is impaired because of chemical abuse or mental or physical illness.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 552.012. QUORUM; VALIDITY OF BOARD ACTION. Except when a greater number is required by this subtitle or by board rule, an action of the board must be by a majority of a quorum.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.